District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-306.02

Procedure to register order for enforcement.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 602, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(3), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in the lead-in language to subsec. (a), substituted “records” for “documents”; in par. (a)(2), substituted “the order” for “all orders”, and substituted “the order” for “an order”; in par. (a)(3), substituted “person requesting” for “party seeking”; in par. (a)(5), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in § 46-303.12, the” for “The”, and deleted “agency or” preceding “person”; and added subsecs. (d) and (e).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 602 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).